Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 15. Taxation and Revenue

§ 1. Assessment of lands and improvements thereon.

All lands and improvements thereon shall be listed for assessment, valued for taxation and assessed separately.

Cross references. —

For provision that no tax shall be imposed without the consent of the people and that all taxation shall be equal and uniform, see art. 1, § 28, Wyo. Const.

As to origin of revenue bills, see art. 3, § 33, Wyo. Const.

As to homestead exemption, see art. 19, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation generally, see title 39.

Special assessments for municipal improvements. —

This section does not restrict the power to levy special assessments for municipal improvements. McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1908).

City council was held not authorized to pass ordinance

taxing each lot certain amount for water for irrigation, regardless of value of the property. Town Council of Hudson v. Board of Comm'rs, 37 Wyo. 160, 259 P. 1051,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1927).

Gross product tax. —

Tax on gross product of all mines and mining claims in Wyoming is a tax on “personalty.” Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

Decision of state court, based on construction of constitution and statutes of Wyoming that gross product tax was not a severance tax, is binding on the federal courts. Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

Taxes not allowable as administrative expense. —

Taxes against a corporation, for which a receiver was appointed, are not allowable as administrative expense. First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Quoted

in

Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1952).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Greenwood v. Pearson, 46 Wyo. 307, 26 P.2d 641,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1933).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Remedies for Defects in General Property Tax Assessments in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 240.

For article, “Royalty Interest — Real or Personal,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 145.

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Assessment of coal lands.

All coal lands in the state from which coal is not being mined shall be listed for assessment, valued for taxation and assessed according to value.

Gross product tax. —

Tax on gross product of all mines and mining claims in Wyoming is a tax on “personalty.” Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

Decision of state court, based on construction of constitution and statutes of Wyoming that gross product tax was not a severance tax, is binding on the federal courts. Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

Taxes not allowable as administrative expense. —

Taxes against a corporation, for which a receiver was appointed, are not allowable as administrative expense. First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Wilkerson v. State Bd. of Equalization, 490 P.2d 1258,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1952).

§ 3. Taxation of mines and mining claims.

All mines and mining claims from which gold, silver and other precious metals, soda, saline, coal, mineral oil or other valuable deposit, is or may be produced shall be taxed in addition to the surface improvements, and in lieu of taxes on the lands, on the gross product thereof, as may be prescribed by law; provided, that the product of all mines shall be taxed in proportion to the value thereof.

Tax deed voidable, not void. —

Assignee's contest of a mineral tax deed was time-barred because an error in the property's assessment rendered the deed voidable, not void, as a county had authority to tax minerals, so there was no clear jurisdictional error. Anadarko Land Corp. v. Family Tree Corp., 2017 WY 24, 389 P.3d 1218,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2017).

Department of revenue and taxation was not required to continue invalid pricing system

used in 1985 for determining the severance tax on uranium, where the system afforded no reasonable relationship to market value and was illegal and contrary to the constitutional mandates of equal and uniform taxation. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Whether mineral deposit is subject to production tax

should be determined by whether it can reasonably be said, considering all economic factors, that value of materials is, in the long run, reasonably able to bear production tax in addition to tax assessed against manufacturer. Certain-Teed Prods. Corp. v. Comly, 54 Wyo. 79, 87 P.2d 21,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1939).

Gypsite, if of requisite quality, is subject to production tax,

notwithstanding that it could be obtained by open workings and inexpensively, since “gypsite” may be considered a mineral or such substance which if of requisite quality would be subject to the tax. Certain-Teed Prods. Corp. v. Comly, 54 Wyo. 79, 87 P.2d 21,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1939).

Tax on production is a personal tax.

First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

And receiver operating property, with consent of mortgagee, is liable

for the production tax. First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Change in allocation between one county and another did not violate provision. —

Wyoming Department of Revenue's ruling that changed the allocation of the company's oil production from a production unit for 1980 through 1988 between one county and intervenor county did not violate Wyo. Const. art. XV, §§ 3 and 11 or Wyo. Const. art. I, § 34 because the company had the burden of showing unconstitutionality and it failed to meet the burden imposed on it in this regard. Moreover, the arguments were not supported by reference to pertinent authority or by cogent argument. BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2006).

Gross product tax. —

Tax on gross product of all mines and mining claims in Wyoming is a tax on “personalty.” Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

The gross product tax is one upon personal property. J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962).

Tax on gross products of all mining claims was property tax, rather than license, privilege or occupation tax. Miller v. Buck Creek Oil Co., 38 Wyo. 505, 269 P. 43,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1928).

Decision of state court, based on construction of constitution and statutes of Wyoming that gross product tax was not a severance tax, is binding on the federal courts. Board of Comm'rs v. Bernardin, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934), cert. denied, 295 U.S. 731, 55 S. Ct. 645, 79 L. Ed. 1680, 1935 U.S. LEXIS 1129 (U.S. 1935).

A lessee under an oil and gas lease which provided that the lessee was to pay “all taxes assessed and levied on said lands” was entitled to deduct from the royalties due the lessor for oil and gas produced the amount of the gross product tax, since the gross product tax is a tax on personal property, the severed product, and not a tax on real estate. Oregon Basin Oil & Gas Co. v. Ohio Oil Co., 70 Wyo. 263, 248 P.2d 198,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1952).

Computation of tax. —

Tax on production of coal lands is based upon the production for the preceding year. First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Method of valuation held proper. —

The application of a method of valuation which, as applied, had the effect of arriving at the value of the mineral at the mine by separating, as components of the total sales price, the value attributable to processing or transportation and the value of the mineral at the mine was proper and legally justified. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Black lung tax included in coal's value. —

The state board of equalization did not err, in determining the taxable value for ad valorem and severance tax purposes of coal produced by a coal company, by including all of the federal black lung excise tax paid to the company by its customers in the value of the coal at the mine mouth, rather than to exclude that portion of the amount paid on the value added to the coal by nontaxable transportation and processing activities. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Assessment held invalid. —

Where gypsite was assessed at $2.85 per ton one year and the next year at $28 per ton, assessment was invalid as arbitrary and as a constructive fraud and not a mere overvaluation. Certain-Teed Prods. Corp. v. Comly, 54 Wyo. 79, 87 P.2d 21,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1939).

Sharing taxes. —

Under lease entitling lessor to take royalty from “net” returns of oil or in kind, lessee could deduct proportionate share of taxes from lessor's interest. Miller v. Buck Creek Oil Co., 38 Wyo. 505, 269 P. 43,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1928).

Tax on products of mining claim covering both claim and royalty interest should be borne by lessor and lessee in proportion to interests. Miller v. Buck Creek Oil Co., 38 Wyo. 505, 269 P. 43,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1928).

Section does not authorize exemption of all operational expenses. —

This section does not admit of an interpretation which would allow oil companies to claim all operational expenses, including depreciation, as an exemption. J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962).

Reclamation costs deductible from coal's value. —

Reclamation costs should be allowed as part of transportation and processing costs deducted from the value of coal. Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Taxes not allowable as administrative expense. —

Taxes against corporation, for which a receiver was appointed, are not allowable as administrative expense. First Nat'l Bank v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 3 F. Supp. 433, 1933 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1628 (D. Wyo. 1933), modified, 74 F.2d 809, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4015 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

Applied

in

Powder River Coal Co. v. Wyo. State Bd. of Equalization, 2002 WY 5, 38 P.3d 423,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2002); Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 797 P.2d 552,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1990); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000); Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted in

Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2017 WY 6, 387 P.3d 725,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note dealing with tax on mineral production, see 4 Wyo. L.J. 250.

For article, “Tax Lien Priority,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 255.

For comment dealing with nature of a royalty interest, see 7 Wyo. L.J. 145.

§ 4. State levy limited.

For state revenue, there shall be levied annually a tax not to exceed four mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of the property in the state except for the support of state educational and charitable institutions, the payment of the state debt and the interest thereon.

Cross references. —

As to levy of property taxes generally, see §

39-13-101

et seq.

School construction. —

The Wyoming Constitution does not prohibit the state from imposing a statewide mill levy taxation level for capital construction of schools, and does not limit the number of mills that can be levied for such a fund. State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Applied

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

§ 5. County levies limited.

For county revenue, there shall be levied annually a tax not to exceed twelve mills on the dollar for all purposes including general school tax, exclusive of state revenue, except for the payment of its public debt and the interest thereon. (As amended by Laws 1967, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 724.)

Cross references. —

As to levy and collection of county school tax, see §

21-13-201

.

For authority of county to levy and collect license taxes and exceptions thereto, see §§

33-1-107

and

33-1-108

.

“County tax” does not include state taxes.

State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1924).

Special county levy. —

A requirement that a county shall levy a special tax to make up a deficiency in a prior annual levy of its quota of state taxes is unaffected by this section. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

School taxes. —

Special school district tax was not “county tax.” State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1924).

Taxes levied for the support of common schools of the county are not taxes for “county purposes.” Powder River Cattle Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 3 Wyo. 597, 29 P. 361, 31 P. 278,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1892), overruled, Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1898).

A levy for payment of interest and principal on school bonds of a district are not “tax for county revenue” within the provisions of this section. McCague Inv. Co. v. Mallin, 25 Wyo. 373, 170 P. 763,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1918).

School district taxes are not levied for county revenue and they are not included in general school taxes as provided in this section. McCague Inv. Co. v. Mallin, 25 Wyo. 373, 170 P. 763,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1918).

School district taxes are not to be considered in determining whether the county tax levy exceeds limitation prescribed by this section. McCague Inv. Co. v. Mallin, 25 Wyo. 373, 170 P. 763,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1918).

General school tax levy by county was “county tax” within statute exempting property of war veterans from taxation. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1924).

Public debt. —

A judgment entered upon a claim or evidence of indebtedness incurred in excess of the ordinary revenue of the county, without a vote of the people, or in excess of the limitation, is not a public debt within the meaning of this section. Grand I. & N. W. R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1896).

Action to enjoin tax. —

Where an action is brought to enjoin a tax because it exceeds the constitutional or statutory authority, only so much of the tax will be enjoined as exceeds the constitutional or statutory authority. Cottle v. Union P. R. Co., 201 F. 39, 1912 U.S. App. LEXIS 1990 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1912).

Stated

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 6. City levies limited.

No incorporated city or town shall levy a tax to exceed eight mills on the dollar in any one year, except for the payment of its public debt and the interest thereon.

Cross references. —

For another provision restricting power of municipal corporations to levy taxes, see art. 13, § 3, Wyo. Const.

Tax intended to suffice for expenses of essential governmental functions. —

It is quite apparent the framers of the constitution thought that a direct tax of eight mills against the property of the city or town (together with indirect taxes permitted) would and should suffice for the payment of expenses incurred in performing the governmental functions essential to the convenience, safety and happiness of the citizens of the municipality, rather than the welfare of the general public. It is hardly probable they contemplated that this limitation should be evaded either directly or indirectly and that a direct tax greater than eight mills could be imposed upon such property for the performance of these functions. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

Section inapplicable to occupation taxes. —

Limit of levy herein refers to property taxes and does not apply to occupation taxes. City of Sheridan v. Litman, 32 Wyo. 14, 228 P. 628,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1924).

Fire protection district. —

The county commissioners could not levy a tax for operation and maintenance of a fire protection district, which tax when combined with general levy of the town exceeded eight mills, since fire protection is a primary governmental function which every city and town must perform. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

Hospital district. —

The county commissioners could levy a tax of not exceeding three mills for the operation and maintenance of a hospital district though tax when combined with town's general levy exceeded eight mills, since operation and maintenance of a hospital district is not an essential function of a town or city. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

Cemetery district. —

The county commissioners could levy a tax of not exceeding three mills for the operation and maintenance of a cemetery district though tax when combined with town's general levy exceeded eight mills, since operation and maintenance of cemetery district is not an essential function of a town or city. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 7. Depositories for public moneys.

All money belonging to the state or to any county, city, town, village or other subdivision therein, except as herein otherwise provided, shall, whenever practicable, be deposited in a national bank or banks or in a bank or banks incorporated under the laws of this state; provided, that the bank or banks in which such money is deposited shall furnish security to be approved as provided by law; and provided further, that such bank or banks shall pay the same rate of interest on any money so deposited therein on time certificates of deposit by the legal custodian or custodians of any such public moneys as such bank or banks pay on time certificates of deposit of private depositors, and the custodian or custodians of any such public moneys shall be authorized to deposit same under time certificates of deposit as may be provided by law. Such interest shall accrue to the fund from which it is derived. (As amended by Laws 1937, Senate Joint Resolution No. 7, p. 319.)

Escrow not within purview of section. —

Escrow held not such a deposit of public moneys as comes within the purview of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

County treasurer not insurer. —

This section does not make a county treasurer an insurer of the safety of public funds, so as to render him liable for the loss by reason of the failure of the bank in which he has deposited them, where he was without negligence. Roberts v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 177, 56 P. 915,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1899).

State is not estopped from pursuing treasurer upon his bond

by bringing suit to trace public funds deposited by him in a bank which afterwards became insolvent, and by accepting dividends from the estate of the banker. State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1898).

No recovery on treasurer's bond. —

Where following a custom in vogue for 18 years, treasurer deposited state funds in a reputable and solvent private bank for safe-keeping, separate from his private account, and owing to a panic, the depository became insolvent, and the greater portion of the funds were lost, no recovery could be had on the official bond where the treasurer was not chargeable with negligence or fraud. State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1898).

Surety succeeds to preference right of state

upon payment of state's loss. National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1925).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 8. Profit making from public funds prohibited.

The making of profit, directly or indirectly, out of state, county, city, town or school district money or other public fund, or using the same for any purpose not authorized by law, by any public officer, shall be deemed a felony, and shall be punished as provided by law.

Cross references. —

As to profit making by public officers in connection with public funds and penalty therefor, see §

9-4-829

.

§ 9. Legislature to provide for state board of equalization.

The legislature shall provide by law for a state board of equalization. (As amended by Laws 1909, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 248.)

Applied

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987); Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Stated

in

Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1958); J. Ray McDermott & Co., v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962); Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 10. Duties of state board of equalization.

The duties of the state board shall be to equalize the valuation on all property in the several counties and such other duties as may be prescribed by law. (As amended by Laws 1985, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 551.)

Cross references. —

For another provision concerning duties of state board of equalization, see §

39-11-102

.1.

“All” as used in this section must, if possible, be given some meaning.

Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Hall, 46 Wyo. 380, 26 P.2d 1071,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1933).

Power to equalize valuations. —

Under this section, as to powers of state board of equalization, in connection with § 11 of this article, requiring uniform assessment, the legislature had power to authorize such board to equalize valuations for other purposes than the state tax. Baker v. Paxton, 29 Wyo. 500, 215 P. 257,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1923).

The state board of equalization has authority to equalize the values where that is appropriate in order to meet the constitutional requirements and the burden is on the taxpayer to establish any overevaluation. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Lawful assessment required. —

To overcome prima facie case in replevin, made by mortgagee of cattle with immediate right to possession, a tax collector distraining cattle, under lien for taxes, must at least show that a lawful assessment was made against cattle of mortgagor in sufficient number to satisfy tax lien. Farm & Cattle Loan Co. v. Faulkner, 34 Wyo. 199, 242 P. 415,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1926).

Requirements for method of valuation. —

In performing its constitutional and statutory functions, the state board of equalization may arrive at different valuations for different property, but the method or system used by the board must lead to a fair value, and the properties must be assessed at a uniform rate. Hillard v. Big Horn Coal Co., 549 P.2d 293,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1976).

Board may not usurp valuation function assigned to department of revenue. —

Board of equalization erred where it departed from its adjudicatory role and assumed function of prescribing system of establishing fair market value of property, which was statutorily assigned to department of revenue. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

Reassessment protested on first statutorily provided occasion. —

A reassessment amount may be protested by the taxpayer, before the county and state board, on the first statutorily provided occasion available after the reassessment has occurred, even if during the next year, after the protest period has passed. In re Appeal of Paradise Valley Country Club, 748 P.2d 298,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1988).

Board of equalization not a proper party to appeal from its own order. —

Board of equalization functions in its adjudicatory capacity when it considers appeal from final decision of department of revenue, and when board acts in its adjudicatory capacity, it is not a proper party to an appeal from its own order. Antelope Valley Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 4 P.3d 876,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2000).

Applied

in

Baker v. Paxton, 29 Wyo. 500, 215 P. 257,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1923); Chicago, N.W. Ry. v. Hall, 46 Wyo. 380, 26 P.2d 1071,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1933); J. Ray McDermott & Co., v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Scott Realty Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 395 P.2d 289,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1964); Rocky Mountain Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State Bd. of Equalization, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 749 P.2d 221,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1987); Amax Coal Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 819 P.2d 825,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Powder River Cattle Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 3 Wyo. 597, 29 P. 361, 31 P. 278,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1892); Powder River Cattle Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 3 Wyo. 597, 29 P. 361, 31 P. 278,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1892); Kelley v. Rhoads, 7 Wyo. 237, 51 P. 593,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 2

, 39 L.R.A. 594 (1898); Pellish Bros. v. Cooper, 47 Wyo. 480, 38 P.2d 607,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1934); In re Union Pac. Motor Freight Co., 72 Wyo. 298, 264 P.2d 771,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(1953); Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Equalization, 79 Wyo. 262, 333 P.2d 700,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(1958); Chicago & N.W. Ry. v. Hillard, 502 P.2d 189,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1972); Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988); Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Department of Revenue, 970 P.2d 841,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1998); Exxon Corp. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 987 P.2d 158,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1999).